Hawaii, session 2026, SB2858.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that subjects of assisted community treatment orders must be taken to an emergency room or admitted to a hospital and be attended by a psychiatrist or advanced practice registered nurse to receive court ordered treatment.  However, mentally ill individuals who are subject to these orders and refuse to be moved, and whose actions do not to rise to the level of necessitating the initiation of emergency transportation to psychiatric or other designated facility, cannot access the treatment they desperately need. The legislature further finds that the city and county of Honolulu's community outreach and response engagement (CORE) program provides ongoing outreach and treatment to the homeless population in the field using an ambulance equipped with medical supplies.  Through the CORE program, state licensed paramedics and registered nurses are able to develop ongoing relationships with the clients they serve and can carry out assisted community treatment orders by administering treatment ordered by a qualified psychiatric examiner. The legislature therefore finds that qualified paramedics licensed by the State and other qualified medical staff should be able to administer court ordered treatment, including the administration of prescription drugs.  Allowing personnel and staff to administer treatment outside of a hospital can facilitate the administration of life saving treatment for persons subject to an assisted community treatment order. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to facilitate the administration of assisted community treatment orders by authorizing registered nurses and licensed paramedics who are operating as part of a county program to administer prescription medication prescribed as part of an assisted community treatment order treatment plan in settings other than a hospital, psychiatric facility, or other designated facility. SECTION 2.  Chapter 334, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VIII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§334-     Administration of assisted community treatment; county programs.  A registered nurse licensed under section 457-7 or qualified paramedic licensed under section 453-34 may administer reasonable and appropriate medication or medications specifically authorized by a court order to a person subject to an order in a location other than a hospital, psychiatric facility, or other facility designated by the director if: (1)  The administration of the medication or medications is consistent with accepted medical standards and the court order, including the written treatment plan submitted pursuant to section 334-126(g); (2)  The registered nurse or paramedic knows that the person is subject to an order; (3)  The registered nurse or paramedic are working within their scope of practice; (4)  The registered nurse or paramedic is providing treatment through a county program, including a county community outreach program; and (5)  The location is equipped with medical supplies and designed specifically to administer prehospital care to patients." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________